Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 321.175 Human trafficking prevention training ââ commercial drivers. 1. An applicant for the initial issuance of a class A, B, or C commercial driverâs license must certify to the department that the applicant successfully completed a course of instruction regarding human trafficking prevention. 2. A course of instruction regarding human trafficking prevention must last at least thirty minutes and include training based on the departmentâs approved human trafficking prevention training materials. The course must be offered in the English language. 3. The department shall approve, in cooperation with the department of education and the state board of education, human trafficking prevention training materials regarding the recognition, prevention, and reporting of human trafficking. The departments may collaborate with other entities that specialize in and produce training materials regarding the recognition, prevention, and reporting of human trafficking particularly for persons who operate commercial motor vehicles. House File 2598, p. 2 The departments shall make the approved human trafficking prevention training materials available to the public. The departments shall review and update the departmentsâ approved human trafficking prevention training materials to account for changes and trends in human trafficking at least once every three years. 4. The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. Sec. 2. Section 321.188, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . h. For a person applying for the initial issuance of a class A, B, or C commercial driverâs license, certify that the applicant has completed a course of instruction regarding human trafficking prevention in accordance with section 321.175. Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies on and after March 1, 2027, or the date the department of transportation submits to the Iowa administrative code editor for publication in the Iowa administrative bulletin a statement by the director of transportation that the applicable phase of the department of transportationâs new records system is implemented, whichever is earlier. The department shall also forward a copy of the statement to the Iowa Code editor. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2598, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor